pt-PT: Classificação do revestimento do cabo: Enterramento direto; Resistente ao fogo; Interior; Baixo fumo zero halogéneo (LSZH); Para exterior; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Resistente a UV; À prova de água; Outro
pt-BR: Classificação da capa do cabo: Enterramento direto; Resistente ao fogo; Interno; Baixa emissão de fumaça zero halogênio (LSZH); Ambiente externo; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Resistente aos raios ultravioleta; À prova d'água; Outro
cs: Hodnocení pláště kabelu: Pro přímé zakopání; Protipožární; Vnitřní; Bezhalogenový s nízkým kouřem (LSZH); Outdoor; Plenum (CMP); Stoupací (CMR); Odolné proti UV záření; Voděodolný; Jiné
zh-CN: 电缆护套等级: 直埋型; 防火级; 室内型; 低烟无卤 (LSZH); 户外; 增压室级 (CMP); 竖井级 (CMR); 抗紫外线; 防水; 其他
hr-HR: Ocjena plašta kabela: Za direktno ukopavanje; Vatrootporni; Unutarnji; Nisko dimni bez halogena (LSZH); Vanjsko rublje; Plenum (CMP); Uspinjača (CMR); Otporno na UV zračenje; Vodootporno; Ostalo
fi: Kaapelin vaipan luokitus: Maahanhaudattava; Palosuojattu; Sisäkäyttöön; Halogeeniton vähäsavuinen (LSZH); Ulkoiluvaatteet; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV-kestävä; Vedenkestävä; Muu
it: Classificazione della guaina del cavo: Interramento diretto; Resistente al fuoco; Interno; Basso fumo zero alogeni (LSZH); Esterni; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Resistente ai raggi UV; Impermeabile; Altro
ja: ケーブルジャケット評価: 直接埋設; 耐火定格; 屋内用; 低煙ゼロハロゲン (LSZH); 屋外; プレナム (CMP); ライザー (CMR); 耐UV; 防水; その他
lt-LT: Kabelio apvalkalo įvertinimas: Tiesioginis įkasimas; Atsparumas ugniai; Vidaus; Mažai dūmų be halogenų (LSZH); Lauko; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Atsparus UV spinduliams; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
ro-RO: Clasificare izolație cablu: Pentru îngropare directă; Ignifugat; Pentru interior; Cu fum redus fără halogeni (LSZH); Îmbrăcăminte de exterior; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Rezistență la UV; Impermeabil; Altele
sk-SK: Klasifikácia plášťa kábla: Priame zakopanie; Protipožiarne hodnotenie; Interiérový; Bezhalogénový s nízkym dymom (LSZH); Outdoor; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Odolný voči UV žiareniu; Vodotesný; Iné
th: อันดับเปลือกสายเคเบิล: ฝังดินโดยตรง; ทนไฟ; ใช้ภายใน; ควันต่ำปราศจากฮาโลเจน (LSZH); กลางแจ้ง; เพลนัม (CMP); ไรเซอร์ (CMR); ทนรังสียูวี; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ru: Рейтинг оболочки кабеля: Для прямой прокладки в земле; Огнестойкий; Для помещений; С низким дымовыделением без галогенов (LSZH); Верхняя одежда; Пленум (CMP); Райзер (CMR); Устойчив к УФ-излучению; Влагозащита; Другой
ko: 케이블 재킷 등급: 직접 매설; 내화 등급; 실내용; 저연 무할로겐 (LSZH); 실외용; 플레넘 (CMP); 라이저 (CMR); UV 차단; 방수; 기타
en: Cable jacket rating: Direct burial; Fire-rated; Indoor; Low smoke zero halogen (LSZH); Outdoor; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV resistant; Waterproof; Other
nl: Classificatie kabelmantel: Direct ingravingsgeschikt; Brandwerend; Binnen; Halogeenvrij met lage rookontwikkeling (LSZH); Buiten; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV-werend; Waterdicht; Andere
el: Βαθμολογία μανδύα καλωδίου: Άμεσης ταφής; Πυράντοχο; Εσωτερικού χώρου; Χαμηλού καπνού χωρίς αλογόνο (LSZH); Υπαίθριος; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Ανθεκτικό στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
es: Clasificación de la cubierta del cable: Entierro directo; Resistente al fuego; Interior; Bajo humo cero halógenos (LSZH); Exterior; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Resistente a los rayos UV; Impermeable; Otros
sv: Kabelmantelns klassificering: Direktnedgrävning; Brandklassad; Inomhus; Låg rök noll halogen (LSZH); Utomhus; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV-beständig; Vattensäker; Övrigt
zh-TW: 纜線外皮等級: 直埋式; 防火等級; 室內用; 低煙無鹵 (LSZH); 戶外; 通風層級 (CMP); 垂直層級 (CMR); 抗紫外線; 防水; 其他
de: Kabelmantel-Bewertung: Erdverlegung; Feuerfest; Innenbereich; Raucharmes halogenfreies Material (LSZH); Outdoor; Plenum (CMP); Steigleitung (CMR); UV-beständig; Wasserdicht; Sonstiges
pl: Klasyfikacja powłoki przewodu: Do zakopywania bezpośredniego; Ognioodporny; Wewnętrzny; Niskodymiący bezhalogenowy (LSZH); Obuwie outdoorowe; Plenum (CMP); Pionowy (CMR); Odporne na promieniowanie UV; Wodoszczelna; Inne
hu: Kábelköpeny besorolása: Közvetlenül földbe fektethető; Tűzálló; Beltéri; Alacsony füstképződésű halogénmentes (LSZH); Kültéri; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV-álló; Vízálló; Egyéb
fr: Classification de la gaine du câble: Enfouissement direct; Classé feu; Intérieur; Faible fumée sans halogène (LSZH); Extérieur; Plénum (CMP); Colonne montante (CMR); Résistant aux UV; Imperméable; Autre
tr: Kablo kılıf derecesi: Doğrudan gömme; Yangına dayanıklı; İç mekan; Düşük duman sıfır halojen (LSZH); Dış giyim; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV ışınlarına dayanıklı; Su geçirmez; Diğer
nb: Kabelkappeklassifisering: Direkte nedgraving; Brannklassifisert; Innendørs; Lav røyk null halogen (LSZH); Utendørs; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV-bestandig; Vannsikker; Annet
sl-SI: Ocena plašča kabla: Za neposredno pokopavanje; Ognjevaren; Notranji; Malo dima brez halogenov (LSZH); Na prostem; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV odporen; Vodoodporen; Drugo
da: Kabelkappevurdering: Direkte nedgravning; Brandklassificeret; Indendørs; Lav røg nul halogen (LSZH); Udendørs; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); UV-bestandig; Vandtæt; Andet
vi: Xếp hạng vỏ cáp: Chôn trực tiếp; Chống cháy; Trong nhà; Ít khói không halogen (LSZH); Ngoài trời; Plenum (CMP); Riser (CMR); Chống tia UV; Chống thấm nước; Khác
bg-BG: Оценка на обвивката на кабела: За директно полагане; Огнеустойчив; За вътрешен монтаж; Нискодимен безхалогенен (LSZH); На открито; Пленум (CMP); Райзер (CMR); Устойчив на UV лъчи; Водоустойчив; Други